Hawaii statutes.
[§124A-62] Unlawfully influencing action of
court. No authority convening a general, special, or summary court-martial
nor any other commanding officer, or officer serving on the staff thereof, may
censure, reprimand, or admonish the court or any member, law officer, or
counsel thereof, with respect to the findings or sentence adjudged by the
court, or with respect to any other exercise of its or his functions in the
conduct of the proceeding. No person subject to this chapter may attempt to
coerce or, by any unauthorized means, influence the action of the court-martial
or any other military tribunal or any member thereof, in reaching the findings
or sentence in any case, or the action of any convening, approving, or
reviewing authority with respect to his judicial acts. [L 1982, c 171, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next